Vermont, session 2025-2026, S8.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 1901 is amended to read:
§ 1901. ADMINISTRATION OF PROGRAM
* * *
(b) The Secretary shall make coverage under the Dr. Dynasaur program
established in accordance with Title XIX (Medicaid) and Title XXI (SCHIP) of
the Social Security Act available to all Vermont residents up to 26 years of age
whose modified adjusted gross income is at or below 312 percent of the federal
poverty level for the applicable family size.
VT LEG #378944 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.8
2025 Page 2 of 2
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378944 v.1